Louisiana, session 2026, SB23.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:5.5(E)(2)(j) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§5.5. Sanitary inspections of certain food service establishments; food safety
certificates
* * *
E.(1)
* * *
(2) The term "food service establishment" shall not include any of the
following:
* * *
(j) An adult residential care provider.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.